Vermont, session 2025-2026, H231.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 4001 is amended to read:
§ 4001. DEFINITIONS
Words and phrases used in this part, unless otherwise provided, shall be
construed to mean as follows:
* * *
(6) Pickerel: the great northern pike, chain pickerel, or muskellunge.
[Repealed.]
(7) Pike perch: walleyed or yellow pike. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 4905 is amended to read:
§ 4905. BIRDS’ NESTS AND EGGS; DESTROYING OR ROBBING
A person shall not take or wilfully willfully destroy the nests or eggs of
wild birds, other than rock pigeons, the English sparrow, starling, or purple
grackle house sparrows, or European starlings, except when necessary to
protect buildings and the nests to be removed contain no eggs or chicks and are
no longer being used by birds for feeding, or when taken as provided in section
4152 of this title.
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 2 of 31
2025
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 4502 is amended to read:
§ 4502. UNIFORM POINT SYSTEM; REVOCATION OF LICENSE
(a) A uniform point system that assigns points to those convicted of a
violation of a provision of this part is established. The conviction report from
the court shall be prima facie evidence of the points assessed. In addition to
other penalties assessed for violation of fish and wildlife statutes, the
Commissioner shall suspend licenses issued under this part that are held by a
person who has accumulated 10 or more points in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (c) of this section.
(b) A person violating provisions of this part shall receive points for
convictions in accordance with the following schedule (all sections are in this
title of the Vermont Statutes Annotated):
(1) Except for biological collection violations determined to be nonpoint
violations under the rules of the Board, five points shall be assessed for any
violation of statutes or rules adopted under this part except those listed in
subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection.
(2) Ten points shall be assessed for:
* * *
(I) § 4706. Snaring animals [Repealed.]
* * *
(Y) Appendix § 2; Appendix § 33, section 14.3. Reporting of big
game
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 3 of 31
2025
* * *
(II) Appendix § 37, as it applies to annual deer limits section 10.
Novice season
(JJ) § 4742a. Youth deer hunting weekend. The points shall be
assessed solely against the adult who is accompanying the youth hunter.
(KK) § 4908. Youth turkey hunting weekend. The points assessed
against the adult accompanying the youth hunter.
(LL) § 4256. Mentored hunting license. The points shall be assessed
against the licensed adult who is accompanying the individual holding the
mentored hunting license.
(MM) § 4827a. Feeding a black bear
(NN) § 4826. Taking deer doing damage
(OO) § 22a. Taking turkey doing damage
(PP) § 35. Taking moose doing damage
(QQ) Appendix § 22, section 6.7; Appendix § 33, section 13.1(g);
Appendix § 37, section 7.7. Possession or transport of a cocked crossbow in or
on a motor vehicle, motorboat, airplane, snowmobile, or other motor-propelled
vehicle [Repealed.]
(RR) Appendix § 7, section 6.3(b). Hunting bear with any dog not
listed on the permit [Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 4 of 31
2025
(3) Twenty points shall be assessed for:
(A) § 4192. General powers and duties; failure to obey warden
[Repealed.]
* * *
(I) § 4745. Taking deer big game out of season prohibited
* * *
(O) Appendix § 7, sections 4.2, 5.1, 5.2, 5.3, 6.1, 6.2, 6.3(b), 6.3(d),
6.3(e), 6.4, 6.5(c), 6.5(d), 7.1, and 7.2, 7.3, and 7.4. Bear, unauthorized taking
(P) Appendix § 22. Turkey season, excluding: requirements for
youth turkey hunting season; section 6.2, and size of shot used or possessed;
and section 6.7, transport of cocked crossbow
* * *
(U) Appendix § 37. Deer management rule, excluding requirements
for youth deer hunting weekend; requirements for novice season; limitations
on feeding of deer; section 7.7, transport of cocked crossbow; reporting big
game; and section 11.0, ban of urine and other natural lures
* * *
(W) § 4711. Crossbow hunting [Repealed.]
(X) Appendix § 4. Hunting with a crossbow without a permit or
license [Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 5 of 31
2025
(Z) Appendix § 44, section 4.6. Use of tooth jawed traps
(AA) Appendix § 44, section 4.11. Taking furbearers with poison
(BB) Appendix § 44, section 4.12. Taking furbearers from a den
(CC) § 4716. Holding or conducting a coyote-hunting competition
(DD) § 4706. Snaring animals
* * *
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 4705 is amended to read:
§ 4705. SHOOTING FROM MOTOR VEHICLES OR AIRCRAFT;
SHOOTING FROM OR ACROSS HIGHWAY; PERMIT
(a) A person shall not take or attempt to take a wild animal by shooting
from a motor vehicle, motorboat, airplane, snowmobile, or other motor-
propelled craft or any vehicle drawn by a motor-propelled vehicle except as
permitted under subsection (e) of this section.
(b)(1) A person shall not carry or possess while in or on a vehicle propelled
by mechanical power or drawn by a vehicle propelled by mechanical power
within the right-of-way of a public highway any of the following:
(A) a rifle, air rifle, arrow rifle, pre-charged pneumatic rifle, or
shotgun containing a loaded cartridge or, shell, or other projectile in the
chamber, mechanism, or in a magazine, or clip within a rifle or shotgun, or;
(B) a muzzle-loading rifle or muzzle-loading shotgun that has been
charged with powder and projectile and the ignition system of which has been
enabled by having an affixed or attached percussion cap, primer, battery, or
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 6 of 31
2025
priming powder, except as permitted under subsections (d) and (e) of this
section.; and
(C) unless it is uncocked, a crossbow in or on a motor vehicle,
motorboat, airplane, snowmobile, or other motor-propelled craft or any vehicle
drawn by a motor-propelled vehicle except as permitted under subsection (e) of
this section.
(2) A person who possesses a rifle, crossbow, or shotgun, including a
muzzle-loading rifle or muzzle-loading shotgun, in or on a vehicle propelled
by mechanical power, or drawn by a vehicle propelled by mechanical power
within a right-of-way of a public highway shall upon demand of an
enforcement officer exhibit the firearm for examination to determine
compliance with this section.
(3) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Air rifle” means a .22 or larger caliber device that fires a bullet
solely by the use of unignited compressed gas as the propellant.
(B) “Arrow rifle” means a device that fires an arrow or bolt solely by
the use of unignited compressed gas as the propellant.
(C) “Pre-charged pneumatic rifle” means an air rifle or arrow rifle for
which the propellant is supplied or introduced by means of a source that is
physically separate from the air gun or arrow gun.
* * *
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 7 of 31
2025
Sec. 5. 23 V.S.A. § 3317(b) is amended to read:
(b) Penalty or fine; $300.00 or $1,000.00 maximum. A person who
violates a requirement under 10 V.S.A. § 1454 shall be subject to enforcement
under 10 V.S.A. § 8007 or 8008 or a fine under this chapter, provided that the
person shall be assessed a penalty or fine of not more than $1,000.00 for each
violation. A person who violates a rule adopted under 10 V.S.A. § 1424 shall
be subject to enforcement under 10 V.S.A. chapter 201 or a fine under this
chapter, provided that the person shall be assessed a penalty of not more than
$300.00 for each violation. A person who violates any of the following
sections of this title shall be subject to a penalty of not more than $300.00 for
each violation:
* * *
Sec. 6. 4 V.S.A. § 1102 is amended to read:
§ 1102. JUDICIAL BUREAU; JURISDICTION
(a) The Judicial Bureau is created within the Judicial Branch under the
supervision of the Supreme Court.
(b) The Judicial Bureau shall have jurisdiction of the following matters:
* * *
(19) Violations of rules adopted under 10 V.S.A. § 1424, relating to the
use of public waters.
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 8 of 31
2025
Sec. 7. 10 V.S.A. § 4255 is amended to read:
§ 4255. LICENSE FEES
(a) Vermont residents may apply for licenses on forms provided by the
Commissioner. Fees for each license shall be:
* * *
(c) A permanent or free license may be secured on application to the
Department by a person qualifying as follows:
* * *
(2) A person who is legally blind who is a Vermont resident may receive
a free permanent fishing license upon submittal of proper proof of blindness as
the Commissioner shall require. A person who is legally blind who is a
resident in a state that provides a reciprocal privilege for Vermont residents
may receive a free one-year fishing license.
(3) A Vermont resident with paraplegia as defined in subdivision
4001(30) of this title or a permanent, severe, physical mobility disability
certified by a physician may receive a free permanent fishing license or, if the
person qualifies for a hunting license, a free combination hunting and fishing
license. A person with paraplegia or a person certified by a physician to have
permanent, severe, physical mobility disability who is a resident of a state that
provides a reciprocal privilege for Vermont residents may receive a free one-
year fishing license or, if the person qualifies for a hunting license, a free one-
year combination fishing and hunting license.
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 9 of 31
2025
(4) A Vermont resident who is a veteran of the U.S. Armed Forces and
who is, or ever has been, 60 percent disabled as a result of a service-connected
disability may receive a free fishing, hunting, or combination hunting and
fishing license that shall include all big game licenses, except for a moose
license, upon presentation of a certificate issued by the veterans’
administration so certifying. A resident of a state that provides a reciprocal
privilege for Vermont veterans and who would qualify for a free license under
this subdivision if the person were a Vermont resident may receive a free one-
year fishing, hunting, or combination hunting and fishing license.
(5) A person participating in a fishing tournament for Special Olympics
may receive a free fishing license valid for that event.
* * *
(7) A certified citizen of a Native American Indian tribe that has been
recognized by the State pursuant to 1 V.S.A. chapter 23 may receive free of
charge one or all of the permanent fishing, hunting, or trapping licenses set
forth in subdivisions (1)(A)–(D) of this subsection if qualified for the license
and upon submission of a current and valid tribal identification card.
(8) A person with developmental disabilities who is a Vermont resident
may receive a free permanent fishing license upon submission to the
Commissioner of a statement signed by the person’s treating health care
provider, as that term is defined in 18 V.S.A. § 9402, certifying that the person
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 10 of 31
2025
meets the definition of a person with development disabilities. “A person with
developmental disabilities” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A. § 9302.
* * *
(n) The Commissioner shall maintain an accounting of lost revenue due to
the issuance of free licenses. The Commissioner annually on or before January
15 shall submit to the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Finance
and the House Committees on Appropriations and on Ways and Means an
accounting of lost revenue from the previous calendar year due to the issuance
of free licenses.
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 4251 is amended to read:
§ 4251. TAKING WILD ANIMALS AND FISH; LICENSE
(a) Except as provided in sections 4253 and 4254b of this title, a person
shall not take wild animals or fish without first having procured a license
therefor; provided, however, that a person under 15 years of age may take fish
in accordance with this part and regulations of the Board, without first having
procured a license therefor.
(b) The Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife may designate two days each
calendar year as “free fishing days” for which no license shall be required.
One day shall occur in the open water fishing season and one day shall occur
during the ice fishing season.
(c) The Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife may designate Labor Day
weekend each year as “free mentored fishing weekend,” during which up to
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 11 of 31
2025
four unlicensed anglers aged 15 years or older can fish with one licensed
angler throughout this three-day period.
Sec. 9. 10 V.S.A. § 4613 is amended to read:
§ 4613. FISHING TOURNAMENTS
(a) No person or organization shall hold a fishing tournament on the waters
of the State without first obtaining a permit from the Department of Fish and
Wildlife. Tournaments held on the Connecticut River, excluding Moore and
Comerford Reservoirs, that do not utilize an access area in Vermont are not
required to obtain a permit from the Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(b) A fishing tournament means a contest in which anglers pay a fee to
enter and in which the entrants compete for a prize based on the quality or size
of the fish they catch. A contest may run multiple days, but the days must be
consecutive for that contest to be considered a single event. A tournament that
limits the entrants to people below 15 years of age or a tournament held as part
of a Special Olympics program shall be exempt from paying the fee required
under subsection (d) of this section.
(c) The Commissioner shall adopt rules that establish the procedure for
implementation of this section. The rules shall include a provision that an
angler may not enter a fish that was caught and confined to an enclosed area
prior to the beginning of the tournament.
(d) The Commissioner shall charge a fee of $50.00 based on the number of
participants for each permit issued under this section and shall deposit the fee
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 12 of 31
2025
collected into the Fish and Wildlife Fund. Tournaments with up to 25
participants shall pay a fee of $10.00; tournaments with 26 to 50 participants
shall pay a fee of $30.00; and tournaments with more than 50 participants shall
pay a fee of $100.00.
Sec. 10. 10 V.S.A. § 4518 is amended to read:
§ 4518. BIG GAME VIOLATIONS; THREATENED AND ENDANGERED
SPECIES; SUSPENSION; VIOLATIONS
(a) Whoever violates a provision of this part or orders or rules of the Board
relating to taking, possessing, transporting, buying, or selling of big game;
relating to threatened or endangered species; or relating to the trade in covered
animal parts or products that constitutes a big game violation shall be fined not
more than $1,000.00 $2,000.00 nor less than $400.00 $500.00 or imprisoned
for not more than 60 days, or both. Upon a second and all subsequent
convictions or any conviction while under license suspension related to the
requirements of part 4 of this title, the violator shall be fined not more than
$4,000.00 $5,000.00 nor less than $2,000.00 or imprisoned for not more than
60 180 days, or both.
(b) As used in this section, “big game violation” means:
(1) violations relating to taking, possessing, transporting, buying, or
selling of big game;
(2) violations of chapter 123 of this title and the rules related to
threatened and endangered species;
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 13 of 31
2025
(3) violation of section 4280 of this title relating to criminal
suspensions;
(4) violations of chapter 124 of this title relating to the trade in covered
animal parts or products;
(5) interference with hunting, fishing, or trapping in violation of section
4708 of this title; or
(6) illegal commercial importation or possession of wild animals in
violation of section 4709 of this title.
Sec. 11. 10 V.S.A. § 4552 is amended to read:
§ 4552. JURISDICTION; VENUE
The Vermont Criminal Division of the Superior Court shall have exclusive
jurisdiction over fish and wildlife violations with the exception of violations
related to section 4572 and chapters 123 and 124 of this title. Venue for
adjudicating fish and wildlife violations shall be the unit of the Criminal
Division of the Superior Court having jurisdiction over the geographical area
where the offense is stated to have occurred.
Sec. 12. 10 V.S.A. § 4572 is amended to read:
§ 4572. DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this subchapter, a minor fish and wildlife violation means:
(1) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4145 (violation of access and landing area
rules);
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 14 of 31
2025
(2) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4251 (taking wild animals and fish
without a license);
(3) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4266 (failure to carry a license on person
or failure to exhibit license);
(4) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4267 (false statements in license
application; altering license; transferring license to another person; using
another person’s license; or guiding an unlicensed person);
(5) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4713 (tree or ground stands or blinds); or
(6) [Repealed.]
(7) a violation of a biological collection rule adopted by the Board under
part 4 of this title; or
(8) except for big game offenses and under revocation offenses, any fish
and wildlife violation as defined by 10 V.S.A § 4551 and not otherwise listed
in this section shall be charged as a minor violation, provided that:
(A) the offender has no prior history of fish and wildlife violations;
(B) no evidence was seized in relation to the violation;
(C) a criminal warrant was not used in relation to the
violation; and
(D) there is no possibility of forfeiture.
(b) “Bureau” means the Judicial Bureau as created in 4 V.S.A. § 1102.
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 15 of 31
2025
Sec. 13. 10 V.S.A. § 4085 is added to read:
§ 4085. REPTILES AND AMPHIBIANS; TAKING; POSSESSION
(a) A person shall not intentionally take a reptile or amphibian in the State
unless authorized by rules adopted under subsection (b) of this section.
(b) The Commissioner may establish requirements for the following by
rule:
(1) the collection or possession for commercial use, export, or sale of
reptiles and amphibians specified by the Commissioner;
(2) the taking of reptiles or amphibians that have been classified as
common, widespread, and abundant, known as S5 ranked species, with stable
or increasing populations indicated by data collected or compiled by the
Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(3) the taking of a reptile or amphibian that due to population, risk to
other native species, or risk to ecosystems has been identified as requiring a
reduction in population; or
(4) under specified criteria, the taking, collection, or possession of a
specified reptile or amphibian for scientific, educational, or noncommercial
cultural or ceremonial purposes.
(c) Rules adopted by the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife under this
section shall be designed to maintain the best health, population, and utilization
levels of the regulated reptile or amphibian.
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 16 of 31
2025
Sec. 14. IMPORT, POSSESSION, AND SALE OF REPTILES AND
AMPHIBIANS; ENDORSEMENTS
(a)(1) A person shall not import, possess, or sell in the State a pond slider
turtle (Trachemys scripta), provided that:
(A) a person may continue to possess a turtle that was legally
acquired as a pet prior to July 1, 2025 or that was legally acquired from a pet
dealer or commercial collection permittee authorized to sell turtles under
subdivision (1)(B) of this subsection; or
(B) a person with a valid pet dealer permit or commercial collection
permit may possess and sell a turtle that the person can document they had
possession of prior to July 1, 2025.
(2) A person is prohibited from releasing to the wild a pond slider
retained as a pet under this subsection. A violation of the prohibition under
this section shall be subject to enforcement as a fish and wildlife violation
under Title 10 part 4.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall be repealed on the effective date of a
rule adopted by the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife under 10 V.S.A.
§ 4085 regulating the import, possession, or sale of the pond slider turtle
(Trachemys scripta).
(c) When the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife under 10 V.S.A.
§ 4085(b) authorizes the taking of a reptile or amphibian by hunting, a hunting
license issued under 10 V.S.A. part 4 that authorizes the taking of reptiles and
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 17 of 31
2025
amphibians under the license shall include an endorsement indicating the
authorized taking.
Sec. 15. 10 V.S.A. § 4709 is amended to read:
§ 4709. TRANSPORT, IMPORTATION, POSSESSION, AND STOCKING
OF WILD ANIMALS; POSSESSION OF WILD BOAR OR FERAL
SWINE
(a) A person shall not bring into, transport into, transport within, transport
through, or possess in the State any live wild bird or animal of any kind,
including reptiles, amphibians, or any manner of feral swine, without
authorization from the Commissioner or his or her the Commissioner’s
designee. The importation permit may be granted under such regulations
therefor as rules, requirements, or conditions that the Commissioner shall
prescribe and only after the Commissioner has made such investigation and
inspection of the birds or animals as she or he the Commissioner may deem
necessary. The Department may dispose of unlawfully possessed or imported
wildlife as it may judge best, and the State may collect treble damages from the
violator of this subsection for all expenses incurred.
(b) No person shall bring into the State from another country, state, or
province wildlife illegally taken, transported, or possessed contrary to the laws
governing the country, state, or province from which the wildlife originated.
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 18 of 31
2025
(c) No person shall place a Vermont-issued tag on wildlife taken outside
the State. No person shall report big game in Vermont when the wildlife is
taken outside the State.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Commissioner or duly
authorized agents of the Department of Fish and Wildlife from bringing into
the State for the purpose of planting, introducing, or stocking or from planting,
introducing, or stocking in the State any wild bird or animal.
(e) Any person who violates this section may be subject to the penalties set
forth in section 4518 of this title and also may be required to pay additional
penalties based on reasonable mitigation and potential economic benefit
associated with commercial trade.
(f) The Commissioner may bring an action in the unit of the Criminal
Division of the Superior Court having jurisdiction over the geographical area
where the offense is stated to have occurred, or the Environmental Division of
the Superior Court, to compel reasonable mitigation and recover economic
benefits for commercial collection and trade violations under this subsection.
(g) Applicants shall pay a permit fee of $100.00.
(f)(h)(1) The Commissioner shall not issue a permit under this section for
the importation or possession of the following live species, a hybrid or genetic
variant of the following species, offspring of the following species, or
offspring or a hybrid of a genetically engineered variant of the following
species: feral swine, including wild boar, wild hog, wild swine, feral pig, feral
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 19 of 31
2025
hog, old world swine, razorback, Eurasian wild boar, or Russian wild boar (Sus
scrofo Linnaeus). A feral swine is:
* * *
Sec. 16. 10 V.S.A. § 5403(a) is amended to read:
(a) Except as authorized under this chapter, a person shall not:
(1) take, possess, or transport wildlife or wild plants that are members of
a threatened or endangered species; or
(2) destroy or adversely impact critical habitat;
(3) sell or offer for sale in intrastate commerce a threatened or
endangered species;
(4) deliver, receive, carry, transport, or ship a threatened or endangered
species in intrastate commerce; or
(5) import a threatened or endangered species into or export a threatened
or endangered species from Vermont.
Sec. 17. 10 V.S.A. § 5408 is amended to read:
§ 5408. AUTHORIZED TAKINGS; INCIDENTAL TAKINGS;
DESTRUCTION OF CRITICAL HABITAT
(a) Authorized taking. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, after
obtaining the advice of the Endangered Species Committee, the Secretary may
permit, under such terms and conditions as the Secretary may require as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the taking of a threatened or
endangered species, the destruction of or adverse impact on critical habitat, or
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 20 of 31
2025
any act otherwise prohibited by this chapter if done for any of the following
purposes:
(1) scientific purposes;
(2) to enhance the propagation or survival of a threatened or endangered
species;
(3) zoological exhibition;
(4) educational purposes;
(5) noncommercial cultural or ceremonial purposes; or
(6) special purposes consistent with the purposes of the federal
Endangered Species Act.
(b) Incidental taking. After obtaining the advice of the Endangered Species
Committee, the Secretary may permit, under such terms and conditions as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the incidental taking of a
threatened or endangered species or the destruction of or adverse impact on
critical habitat if:
(1) the taking is necessary to conduct an otherwise lawful activity;
(2) the taking is attendant or secondary to, and not the purpose of, the
lawful activity;
(3) the impact of the permitted incidental take is minimized; and
(4) the incidental taking will not impair the conservation or recovery of
any endangered species or threatened species.
* * *
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 21 of 31
2025
(k) Public notice. Prior Except for threatened and endangered species
listed by the Secretary in accordance with subsection 5410(b) of this title, prior
to issuing a permit for an incidental taking and prior to the initial issuance or
amendment of a general permit under this section, the Secretary shall provide
for public notice of no not fewer than 30 days, opportunity for written
comment, and opportunity to request a public informational hearing. The
Except for threatened and endangered species listed by the Secretary in
accordance with subsection 5410(b) of this title, the Secretary shall post permit
applications, permit decisions, and the initial or amended general permits on
the website of the Agency of Natural Resources. The Except for threatened and
endangered species listed by the Secretary in accordance with subsection
5410(b) of this title, the Secretary also shall provide notice to interested
persons who request notice of permit applications, permit decisions, and
proposed general permits or proposed amendments to general permits.
(l) General permits.
(1) The Secretary may issue general permits for activities that will not
affect the continued survival or recovery of a threatened or endangered species.
* * *
(6) Prior Except for threatened and endangered species listed by the
Secretary in accordance with subsection 5410(b) of this title, prior to issuing an
initial or amended general permit under this subsection, the Secretary shall:
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 22 of 31
2025
(A) post a draft of the general permit on the Agency website;
(B) provide public notice of at least 30 days; and
(C) provide for written comments or a public hearing, or both.
(7) For applications for coverage under the terms of an issued general
permit, the applicant shall provide notice on a form provided by the Secretary.
The Except for threatened and endangered species listed by the Secretary in
accordance with subsection 5410(b) of this title, the Secretary shall post notice
of the application on the Agency website and shall provide an opportunity for
written comment, regarding whether the application complies with the terms
and conditions of the general permit, for ten 10 days following receipt of the
application.
* * *
Sec. 18. 10 V.S.A. § 5410 is amended to read:
§ 5410. LOCATION CONFIDENTIAL
(a) The Secretary shall not disclose information regarding the specific
location of threatened or endangered species sites or habitats except that the
Secretary shall disclose information regarding the location of the threatened or
endangered species to:
(1) to the owner of land upon which the species is located;
(2) to a potential buyer of land upon which the species is located who
has a bona fide contract to buy the land and applies to the Secretary for
disclosure of threatened or endangered species information; or
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 23 of 31
2025
(3) to qualified individuals or organizations, public agencies, and
nonprofit organizations for scientific research or for preservation and planning
purposes when the Secretary determines that the preservation of the species is
not further endangered by the disclosure; or
(4) during regulatory processes with the exception of threatened or
endangered species listed under subsection (b) of this section.
(b) The Secretary shall maintain a subset list of threatened and endangered
species whose specific names shall not be included in regulatory planning.
The subset list shall include threatened or endangered species for which the
species names and locations shall not be disclosed because of the risk that the
species will be significantly harmed by unauthorized take, such as illegal
collection, commercial trade, human-caused mortality, or destruction of
habitat. The list shall be based on the rarity of the species, known collection
and commercial trade activities in Vermont and other states or countries,
incidents of human-caused mortality or destruction of habitat, and other factors
that present a threat to the continued existence of the species.
(c) When the Secretary issues a permit under this chapter to take a
threatened or endangered species or destroy or adversely impact critical habitat
and when the Secretary designates critical habitat by rule under section 5402a
of this title, the Secretary shall disclose only the municipality and general
location where the threatened or endangered species or designated critical
habitat is located. When the Secretary designates critical habitat under section
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 24 of 31
2025
5402a of this title, the Secretary shall notify the municipality in which the
critical habitat is located and shall disclose the general location of the
designated critical habitat.
Sec. 19. 10 V.S.A. § 4829 is amended to read:
§ 4829. PERSON SUFFERING DAMAGE BY DEER OR BLACK BEAR
(a) A person engaged in the business of farming who suffers damage by
deer to the person’s crops, fruit trees, or crop-bearing plants on land not posted
against the hunting of deer, or a person engaged in the business of farming who
suffers damage by black bear to the person’s cattle, sheep, swine, poultry, or
bees or bee hives on land not posted against hunting or trapping of black bear
is entitled to reimbursement for the damage up to an amount not to exceed
$5,000.00 per year, and may apply to the Department of Fish and Wildlife
within 72 hours of the occurrence of the damage for reimbursement for the
damage. As used in this section, “post” means any signage that would lead a
reasonable person to believe that hunting is prohibited on the land.
(b) As used in this section, a person is “engaged in the business of farming”
if he or she earns at least one-half of the farmer’s annual gross income from the
business of farming, as that term is defined in the Internal Revenue Code, 26
C.F.R. § 1.175-3. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 25 of 31
2025
Sec. 20. 10 V.S.A. § 599a is amended to read:
§ 599a. REPORTS; RULEMAKING
(a) On or before January 15, 2025, the Agency, in consultation with the
State Treasurer, shall submit a report to the General Assembly detailing the
feasibility and progress of carrying out the requirements of this chapter,
including any recommendations for improving the administration of the
Program.
(b) The Agency shall adopt rules necessary to implement the requirements
of this chapter, including:
(1) adopting methodologies using available science and publicly
available data to identify responsible parties and determine their applicable
share of covered greenhouse gas emissions; and
(2) requirements for registering entities that are responsible parties and
issuing notices of cost recovery demands under the Program; and
(3) the Resilience Implementation Strategy, which shall include:
(A) practices utilizing nature-based solutions intended to stabilize
floodplains, riparian zones, lake shoreland, wetlands, and similar lands;
(B) practices to adapt infrastructure to the impacts of climate change;
(C) practices needed to build out early warning mechanisms and
support fast, effective response to climate-related threats;
(D) practices that support economic and environmental sustainability
in the face of changing climate conditions; and
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 26 of 31
2025
(E) criteria and procedures for prioritizing climate change adaptation
projects eligible to receive monies from the Climate Superfund Cost Recovery
Program.
(c) On or before September 15, 2025, the Secretary shall submit to the
House Committee on Environment and the Senate Committee on Natural
Resources and Energy a report summarizing the Agency of Natural Resources’
adoption of the Resilience Implementation Strategy. The Strategy shall
include:
(1) practices utilizing nature-based solutions intended to stabilize
floodplains, riparian zones, lake shoreland, wetlands, and similar lands;
(2) practices to adapt infrastructure to the impacts of climate change;
(3) practices needed to build out early warning mechanisms and support
fast, effective response to climate-related threats;
(4) practices that support economic and environmental sustainability in
the face of changing climate conditions; and
(5) criteria and procedures for prioritizing climate change adaptation
projects eligible to receive monies from the Climate Superfund Cost Recovery
Program.
(d) In adopting the Strategy, the Agency shall:
(1) consult with the Environmental Justice Advisory Council;
(2) in consultation with other State agencies and departments, including
the Department of Public Safety’s Division of Vermont Emergency
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 27 of 31
2025
Management, assess the adaptation needs and vulnerabilities of various areas
vital to the State’s economy, normal functioning, and the health and well-being
of Vermonters;
(3) identify major potential, proposed, and ongoing climate change
adaptation projects throughout the State;
(4) identify opportunities for alignment with existing federal, State, and
local funding streams;
(5) consult with stakeholders, including local governments, businesses,
environmental advocates, relevant subject area experts, and representatives of
environmental justice focus populations;
(6) consider components of the Vermont Climate Action Plan required
under section 592 of this title that are related to adaptation or resilience, as
defined in section 590 of this title; and
(7) conduct public engagement in areas and communities that have the
most significant exposure to the impacts of climate change, including
disadvantaged, low-income, and rural communities and areas.
(d)(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the existing
authority of a State agency, department, or entity to regulate greenhouse gas
emissions or establish strategies or adopt rules to mitigate climate risk and
build resilience to climate change.
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 28 of 31
2025
Sec. 21. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 122, Sec. 3 is amended to read:
Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION
(a) On or before July 1, 2025, the Agency of Natural Resources pursuant to
3 V.S.A. § 837 shall file with the Interagency Committee on Administrative
Rules the proposed rule for the adoption of the Resilience Implementation
Strategy required pursuant to 10 V.S.A § 599a(b)(3). On or before January 1,
2026, the Agency of Natural Resources shall adopt the final rule establishing
the Resilience Implementation Strategy required pursuant to 10 V.S.A
§ 599a(b)(3). [Repealed.]
(b) On or before July 1, 2026 2027, the Agency of Natural Resources
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 837 shall file with the Interagency Committee on
Administrative Rules the proposed rules required pursuant to 10 V.S.A. §
599a(b)(1) and (b)(2). On or before January 1, 2027 2028, the Agency of
Natural Resources shall adopt the final rule rules required pursuant to 10
V.S.A. § 599a(b)(1) and (b)(2).
Sec. 22. 10 V.S.A. § 596 is amended to read:
§ 596. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(7) “Covered greenhouse gas emissions” means the total quantity of
greenhouse gases released into the atmosphere during the covered period,
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 29 of 31
2025
expressed in metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent, resulting from the use of
fossil fuels extracted or refined by an entity during the covered period.
* * *
(22) “Responsible party” means any entity or a successor in interest to
an entity that during any part of the covered period was engaged in the trade or
business of extracting fossil fuel or refining crude oil and is determined by the
Agency attributable to for more than one billion metric tons of covered
greenhouse gas emissions during the covered period. The term responsible
party does not include any person who lacks sufficient connection with the
State to satisfy the nexus requirements of the U.S. Constitution.
* * *
Sec. 23. 10 V.S.A. § 598(b) is amended to read:
(b) With respect to each responsible party, the cost recovery demand shall
be equal to an amount that bears the same ratio to the cost to the State of
Vermont and its residents, as calculated by the State Treasurer pursuant to
section 599c of this title, from the emission of covered greenhouse gases
during the covered period gas emissions as the responsible party’s applicable
share of covered greenhouse gas emissions bears to the aggregate applicable
shares of covered greenhouse gas emissions resulting from the use of fossil
fuels extracted or refined during the covered period.
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 30 of 31
2025
Sec. 24. 10 V.S.A. § 599c is amended to read:
§ 599c. STATE TREASURER REPORT ON THE COST TO VERMONT OF
COVERED GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
On or before January 15, 2026 2027, the State Treasurer, after consultation
with the Interagency Advisory Board to the Climate Action Office, and with
any other person or entity whom the State Treasurer decides to consult for the
purpose of obtaining and utilizing credible data or methodologies that the State
Treasurer determines may aid the State Treasurer in making the assessments
and estimates required by this section, shall submit to the Senate Committees
on Appropriations, on Finance, on Agriculture, and on Natural Resources and
Energy and the House Committees on Appropriations; on Ways and Means; on
Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and Forestry; and on Environment and Energy
an assessment of the cost to the State of Vermont and its residents of the
emission of covered greenhouse gases for the period that began on January 1,
1995 and ended on December 31, 2024 gas emissions. The assessment shall
include:
* * *
(3) a categorized calculation of the costs that have been incurred and are
projected to be incurred in the future within the State of Vermont to abate the
effects of covered greenhouse gas emissions from between January 1, 1995
and December 31, 2024 on the State of Vermont and its residents.
VT LEG #384189 v.1

No. 47 Page 31 of 31
2025
Sec. 25. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. 20–24 (climate superfund act) shall take effect
on passage.
(b) All other sections shall take effect on July 1, 2025, except that:
(1) Sec. 7 (free fishing license; person with developmental disabilities)
shall take effect on January 1, 2026; and
(2) in Sec. 13, 10 V.S.A. § 4085(a) (related to the taking of reptiles and
amphibians) shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
Date Governor signed bill: June 5, 2025
VT LEG #384189 v.1